California statutes. Public Utilities Code
No producer of gas owning or controlling petroleum refining capacity of 100,000 or more barrels per day in California, or a producer of gas owned or controlled by a producer of gas owning or controlling petroleum refining capacity of 100,000 or more barrels per day in California, may be a member of an association organized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Marketing Contracts [3201. - 3206.]

3201.

The association and its members may make and execute marketing contracts which require the members to sell, for any period of time not to exceed the productive life of the gas facilities or supplies, all or any specified part of any gas produced by the members exclusively to or through the association or any facilities of the association. If the members contract a sale to the association, title to the gas passes absolutely and unreservedly, except for recorded liens, to the association upon delivery or at any other specified time which is expressly and definitely agreed in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

The contract may provide that the association may sell or resell any gas which is delivered by its members, with or without taking title to the gas, and pay over to its members the resale price, after deducting all of the following:

(a) Necessary selling, overhead, and other costs and expenses, including interest on preferred stock, not exceeding 8 percent per annum, and reserves for retiring the stock, if any.

(b) Other proper reserves.

(c) Interest not exceeding 8 percent per annum upon common stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Civil Code, a contract which is entered into by a member of an association which provides for the delivery to the association of any gas produced by the member may be specifically enforced by the association to secure the delivery to it of that gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3204.

The bylaws or the marketing contract may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by the member to the association for the breach of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of gas and may provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees, if any action is brought upon the contract by the association. These provisions are valid and enforceable in the courts of this state. Provisions for liquidated damages are enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.

If there is a breach or threatened breach of a marketing contract by a member, the association may file an action for an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and for a decree of specific performance of the contract. Pending the adjudication of that action and upon filing a verified complaint which shows the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing a sufficient bond, the association shall be issued a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.

In any action upon a marketing agreement, it is conclusively presumed that a landowner, landlord, or lessor is able to control the delivery of any gas which is produced on his or her land by the tenants or others, whose tenancy or possession on the land, or the terms of whose tenancy or possession on the land were created or changed after execution by the landowner, landlord, or lessor of the marketing agreement. In that action, the remedies for nondelivery or breach which are provided by this article are enforceable against the landowner, landlord, or lessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Reorganization of Corporations Organized Pursuant to Other Laws [3221. - 3224.]

3221.

Any corporation which is organized or existing pursuant to any other law may be brought under this chapter by amending its articles of incorporation, in the manner which is prescribed by the general corporation laws, to conform to this chapter. If any corporation amends its articles of incorporation to conform to this chapter, it is deemed to be organized and existing pursuant to, entitled to the benefit of, and subject to, this chapter for all purposes and as fully as though it had been originally organized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3222.

Articles of incorporation are deemed to conform to this chapter within the meaning of Section 3291 in both of the following cases:

(a) It is provided or declared in the articles of incorporation, in substance, regardless of form, that the corporation is organized and exists as a nonprofit cooperative corporation for the purposes which are provided for in, or permitted by, this chapter, or one or more of those purposes.

(b) It clearly appears from the articles of incorporation that the corporation desires to be subject to, and to be organized, exist, and function pursuant to, this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3223.

If the amended articles conform, as provided in Section 3222, provisions in the articles of incorporation that appeared in the original articles or some previous amended articles are ineffective if, and to the extent that, they are inapplicable to, or inconsistent with, this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3224.

This article applies retrospectively as well as prospectively, and may be availed of by a corporation regardless of the time of incorporation, whether prior or subsequent to the adoption of this article, and shall apply to amendments to articles of incorporation whether made prior or subsequent to the adoption of this article, and all amendments made prior to the adoption of this article shall be effective and valid to the same extent as though made subsequent to the adoption of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 680, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Gas Producer Acquisition of Easement Rights [3250. - 3255.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [3250. - 3252.]

3250.

Unless the context otherwise requires the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3251.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, but does not include an association, as defined in Section 3002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3252.

“Natural gas” means all gas produced in this state, natural or manufactured, except propane, for light, heat, or power.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Acquisition of Easement Rights [3255. - 3255.]

3255.

(a) A person involved in the production of natural gas may buy, hold, and exercise all privileges of ownership of real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of, or incidental to, transmission of natural gas. Without limiting the foregoing, a person involved in the production of natural gas may acquire a real property easement from a public utility for the purpose of accommodating the person’s gas plant, and the easement shall be deemed to be held for a public purpose by the person, provided that the commission finds that the use by the person is in the public interest.

(b) Within 10 days of submitting an application to the commission for an order authorizing a public utility to transfer a real property easement to a person, the public utility shall provide written notification of the application and of the commission’s pending review of the application, to each owner of real property affected by the easement. Costs of notification required by this subdivision shall be paid by the person to whom the public utility proposes to transfer a real property easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. GENERAL PROVISIONS [3260. - 3260.]

3260.

Nothing in this division prohibits payments pursuant to an agreement authorized by the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), or payments permitted by the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Secs. 173, 175a, and 186). Nothing in this division restricts any use permitted by federal law of money paid pursuant to these acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 599, Sec. 11.   (SB 790)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. Wildfire [3280. - 3299.100.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [3280. - 3280.]

3280.

For purposes of this part, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Account” means the Continuation Account created pursuant to Section 3298. This subdivision shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(b) “Account assets” means the sum of all moneys and invested assets held in the account, which shall include, without limitation, any loans or
 other investments made by the state to the account, all interest or other income from the investment of money held in the account, any other funds specifically designated for the account by applicable law, the proceeds of any special charge or continuation of existing charge allocated to and deposited into the account, reinsurance, and the proceeds of any bonds issued for the benefit of the account. This subdivision shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(c) “Administrator” means the Wildfire Fund Administrator appointed pursuant to Section 8899.72 of the
 Government Code.

(d) “Annual contribution” means either of the following:

(1) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3281) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3291), 10 installments totaling either of the following:

(A) For an electrical corporation that qualifies as a large electrical corporation at the end of the prior calendar year, an amount equal to three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) multiplied by the Wildfire Fund allocation metric.

(B) For an electrical corporation that qualifies as a regional electrical corporation at the end of the prior calendar year, an amount equal to twenty-five dollars ($25) multiplied by the number of customer accounts serviced by the electrical corporation within the state
 at the end of that calendar year.

(2) For purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3298) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3299), for a large electrical corporation, the amount determined pursuant to Section 3299.3. This paragraph shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(e) “Council” means the California Catastrophe Response Council created pursuant to Section 8899.70 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) (A) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3281) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3291), “covered wildfire” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1701.8. This subparagraph shall become inoperative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(B) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3281) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3291), “covered wildfire” means a wildfire ignited before the effective date of this subparagraph and that meets the
 requirements of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1701.8. This subparagraph shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(2) For purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3298) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3299), “covered wildfire” means a wildfire ignited on or after the effective date of this paragraph and that meets the requirements of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1701.8. This paragraph shall become operative upon all large electrical corporations electing to participate in the account pursuant to Section 3299.

(g) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 218.

(h) “Eligible claims” means claims for third-party damages against an electrical corporation resulting from covered wildfires exceeding the greater of (1) one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in the aggregate in any year, or (2) the amount of the insurance coverage required to be in place for the electrical corporation pursuant to Section
 3293 or 3299.4, as appropriate, measured by the amount of that excess.

(i) “Fund” means the Wildfire Fund created pursuant to Section 3284.

(j) “High fire-threat district” means areas identified as tier 2 (elevated) or tier 3 (extreme) fire risk on the fire-threat map maintained by the
 commission.

(k) “Initial contribution” means either of the following:

(1) For a large electrical corporation, an amount equal to seven billion five hundred million dollars ($7,500,000,000) multiplied by the Wildfire Fund allocation metric.

(2) For a regional electrical corporation, an amount equal to six hundred twenty-five dollars ($625) multiplied by the number of customer accounts serviced by the electrical corporation within the state as of July 12, 2019.

(l) “Insolvency proceeding” means a bankruptcy, insolvency, liquidation, reorganization, or similar proceeding brought pursuant to Title 11 of the United States Code.

(m) “Large electrical corporation” means an electrical corporation with 250,000 or more customer accounts within the state.

(n) “Participating electrical corporation” means an electrical corporation that satisfies the conditions to participate in the fund pursuant to Section 3291 or 3292, as applicable.

(o) “Regional electrical corporation” means an electrical corporation with less than 250,000 customer accounts within the state.

(p) “Wildfire Fund allocation metric” means, for each large electrical corporation, the arithmetic average of (1) the land area of the electrical corporation’s territory, measured in square miles, in the high fire-threat districts as a proportion of all large electrical corporations’ territory in the high fire-threat districts and (2) the electrical corporation’s line miles of transmission and distribution lines in the high fire-threat districts as a proportion of all large electrical corporations’ line miles of transmission and distribution lines in the high fire-threat districts. The large electrical corporations’ averages shall then be adjusted to account for risk mitigation efforts. This adjustment shall reduce the allocation to electrical corporations that have invested historically in mitigation efforts and those allocations shall be
 reallocated to the other electrical corporations based on their proportionate share resulting from the initial calculation above. The Wildfire Fund allocation metric shall be determined by the Director of Finance no later than July 17, 2019. It is the expectation of the Legislature that the Wildfire Fund allocation metric is 64.2 percent for Pacific Gas and Electric Company, 31.5 percent for Southern California Edison Company, and 4.3 percent for San Diego Gas and Electric Company. If a new electrical corporation that is a large electrical corporation is admitted to the Wildfire Fund, the administrator shall promptly determine and publish a revised Wildfire Fund allocation metric based on the factors set forth in this subdivision.

(q) “Wildfire Fund assets” means the sum of all moneys and invested assets held in the fund, which shall include, without limitation, any loans or other investments made by the state to the fund, all interest or other income from the investment of money held in the fund, any other funds specifically designated for the fund by applicable law, the proceeds of any special charge or continuation of existing charge allocated to and deposited into the fund, reinsurance, and the proceeds of any bonds issued for the benefit of the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 40.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Wildfire Fund [3281. - 3289.]

3281.

The administrator shall carry out the duties of this part and may do all of the following, subject to the oversight of the council:

(a) Retain, employ, or contract with officers, experts, employees, accountants, actuaries, financial professionals, and other executives, advisers, consultants, attorneys, and professionals as may be necessary in the administrator’s judgment for the efficient operation and administration of the fund.

(b) Enter into contracts and other obligations relating to the operation, management, and administration of the fund.

(c) Invest the moneys in the fund in those securities eligible under Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(d) Review and approve claims and settlements, and provide funds to the participating electrical corporations for the purposes of paying eligible claims.

(e) Buy insurance or take other actions to maximize the claims-paying resources of the fund.

(f) Pay costs, expenses, and other obligations of the fund from Wildfire Fund assets.

(g) Take any actions necessary to collect any amounts owing to the fund from participating electrical corporations.

(h) Undertake such other activities as are related to the operation, management, and administration of the fund, as approved by the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 39.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3282.

There shall be a limited civil immunity, and no criminal liability in a private capacity, on account of any act performed or omitted or obligation entered into in an official capacity, when done or omitted in good faith and without intent to defraud, on the part of the counsel, the administrator, or on the part of any officer, employee, or agent of the fund. The State of California shall have no liability for payment of claims in excess of funds available pursuant to this part. The State of California, and any of the funds of the State of California, shall have no obligations whatsoever for payment of claims or costs arising from this part, except as specifically provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 40.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3283.

(a) The administrator shall prepare and submit to the council an annual report on the operations, financial condition, and activities of the fund and the account that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The Wildfire Fund assets and the account assets.

(2) Projections for the durability of the fund and the account.

(3) Information on claims received and paid.

(4) Summary of actions of the council or the administrator.

(5) A plan for winding up the fund or the account if
 projections demonstrate that the Wildfire Fund assets or the account assets will be exhausted within the next three years.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, upon approval of the council, the report shall be submitted no later than August 15 of each year to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(2) The report required by paragraph (1) shall be submitted in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 42.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3284.

(a) There is hereby created the Wildfire Fund, which is not a fund in the State Treasury.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund is continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for the purposes of this part.

(c) (1) The fund shall be administered by the administrator, subject to the direction of the council, in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3291) to provide funds to participating electrical corporations to satisfy eligible claims arising from a covered wildfire in accordance with this part.

(2) At the
 discretion of the administrator, segregated, dedicated accounts within the fund may be established.

(d) The fund shall be continued in existence unless the administrator winds down the fund in accordance with Section 3291 or 3292, as applicable.

(e) Uninvested moneys in the fund may be deposited from time to time in financial institutions authorized by law to receive deposits of public moneys or, with the approval of the Treasurer, the Surplus Money Investment Fund as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) A national bank shall be custodian of all securities belonging to the fund, except as otherwise provided in the constituent instruments that define the rights of the holders of the bonds as set forth in Division 28
 (commencing with Section 80500) of the Water Code.

(g) With the approval of the council, the administrator shall establish and approve procedures for the review, approval, and timely funding of eligible claims. The procedures may be revised from time to time by the administrator with the approval of the council. The procedures may include processes to facilitate and expedite the review and approval of settled eligible claims, including guidelines for, or preapproval of, settlement levels. The procedures shall provide for the reimbursement of eligible claims within 45 days of the date the administrator approves the settlement amount for any eligible claim unless that timing is not practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3285.

(a) The fund shall be initially capitalized by a loan from the state’s Surplus Money Investment Fund pursuant to Section 3288.

(b) Proceeds of any bonds issued as provided in Division 28 (commencing with Section 80500) of the Water Code shall be used as provided in Section 80550 of the Water Code. Any proceeds from the bonds allocated to the fund shall be deposited into a segregated account within the fund.

(c) All of the following shall be deposited into the fund:

(1) Initial contributions from electrical corporations.

(2) Annual contributions from
 electrical corporations.

(3) Revenue generated from the ratepayers of a participating regional electrical corporation by a charge authorized by the commission pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3289 and remitted to the fund pursuant to Section 3291 or 3292, as applicable.

(4) Revenues generated from the ratepayers of each large electrical corporation by a charge authorized by the commission pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3289 as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 80550.

(5) Proceeds of bonds allocated to the fund as provided in Section 80550 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3286.

The Director of Finance may, at any time, examine the books and records of the council and the administrator relating to the operation, management, and administration of the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (AB 1054)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3288.

(a) If Section 3291 is operative, the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Treasurer and the administrator, shall determine the amount and timing of moneys needed to support the purposes of this part. The Director of Finance shall request those moneys from the Controller. Upon that request, the Controller shall transfer up to ten billion five hundred million dollars ($10,500,000,000) to the fund from the Surplus Money Investment Fund and other funds that accrue interest to the General Fund as a cash loan. The loan principal and interest shall be fully repaid as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 80550 of the Water Code.

(b) If Section 3292 is operative, the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Treasurer and the administrator, shall determine a
 schedule to provide ten billion five hundred million dollars ($10,500,000,000) to the fund and shall provide that schedule to the Controller within 60 days. The Controller shall transfer the moneys from the Surplus Money Investment Fund and other funds that accrue interest to the General Fund pursuant to the schedule provided by the Director of Finance as a loan to support the purposes of this part. The loan from the Surplus Money Investment Fund is intended to provide necessary cash on a short-term basis for claims-paying resources. It is the intent of the Legislature that the loan be repaid as quickly as possible within a fiscal year. The loan shall be repaid by the proceeds of the charges authorized pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3289 or the proceeds of any bonds as set forth in Division 28 (commencing with Section 80500) of the Water Code.

(c) In the case of subdivision (a) or (b), interest
 payments on outstanding loan amounts shall be calculated at the greater of the quarter-to-date yield at the one-year constant maturity United States Treasury rate for the calendar quarter concluded directly before the calculation or the Surplus Money Investment Fund rate at the time of the cash transfer. The interest payments shall be paid on a quarterly basis from Wildfire Fund assets following the cash transfer and shall continue until the loan has been fully repaid. The interest payments are interest earnings of the Surplus Money Investment Fund and shall be apportioned pursuant to Sections 16475 and 16480.6 of the Government Code.

(d) Whether Section 3291 or 3292 is operative, an initial transfer to the fund of no less than two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) shall be made in the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(e) Prior to a transfer being made from the Surplus Money Investment Fund
 pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the Director of Finance shall determine if the transfer would result in the General Fund’s estimated cash and unused borrowable resources declining below three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) at any point in time over the succeeding 24-month period. If the Director of Finance determines that the transfer would result in estimated cash and unused borrowable resources declining below that level, the transfer of funds from the Surplus Money Investment Fund shall not be made. This subdivision shall not apply to the first two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) of transfers made in the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 42.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3289.

(a) (1) No later than July 26, 2019, the commission shall initiate a rulemaking proceeding to consider using its authority pursuant to Section 701 to require each electrical corporation, except a regional electrical corporation that chooses not to participate in any fund pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3291), to collect a nonbypassable charge from ratepayers of the electrical corporation to support the fund, including the payment of any bonds issued pursuant to Division 28 (commencing with Section 80500) of the Water Code, as follows:

(A) For a large electrical corporation, a charge in an amount sufficient to fund the revenue requirement, as established
 pursuant to Section 80524 of the Water Code.

(B) For a regional electrical corporation, the amount equal to one-half cent per kilowatt-hour ($0.005/kWh).

(2) If the commission determines that the imposition of the charge described in paragraph (1) is just and reasonable, and that it is appropriate to exercise its authority pursuant to Section 701 to do so, the commission shall direct each electrical corporation to impose and collect that charge commencing in the month immediately following the month in which the final imposition of the revenue requirement with respect to bonds previously issued pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code is made. The charge shall be collected in the same manner as that for the payments made to reimburse the
 Department of Water Resources pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) of the Water Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, no later than 90 days after the initiation of the rulemaking proceeding, the commission shall adopt a decision regarding the imposition of the charge.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 455.5 or 1708, or any other law, the commission shall not revise, amend, or otherwise modify a decision to impose a charge made pursuant to this section at any time before January 1, 2036.

(d) If the administrator authorizes Golden State Energy to participate in the fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3292, Golden State Energy’s ratepayers shall be subject to the nonbypassable charge
 previously imposed by the commission pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 10.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Operation of the Fund [3291. - 3297.]

3291.

(a) The fund shall be established as a revolving liquidity fund that will pay eligible claims as provided in subdivision (c) and obtain reimbursement from electrical corporations as set forth in subdivision (d).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), to participate in the fund established pursuant to subdivision (a), an electrical corporation must meet the following conditions by no later than June 30, 2020:

(1) The electrical corporation is not, and has not been since July 12, 2019, the subject of an insolvency proceeding or on criminal probation unless the electrical corporation meets the following conditions:

(A) The electrical
 corporation’s insolvency proceeding has been resolved pursuant to a plan or similar document not subject to a stay.

(B) The bankruptcy court or a court of competent jurisdiction, in the insolvency proceeding, has determined that the resolution of the insolvency proceeding provides funding or establishes reserves for, provides for assumption of, or otherwise provides for satisfying any prepetition wildfire claims asserted against the electrical corporation in the insolvency proceeding in the amounts agreed upon in any pre-insolvency proceeding settlement agreements or any post-insolvency settlement agreements, authorized by the court through an estimation process or otherwise allowed by the court.

(C) The commission has approved the reorganization plan and other documents resolving the insolvency proceeding, including the electrical corporation’s resulting governance structure, as
 being acceptable in light of the electrical corporation’s safety history, criminal probation, recent financial condition, and other factors deemed relevant by the commission.

(D) The commission has determined that the reorganization plan and other documents resolving the insolvency proceeding are (i) consistent with the state’s climate goals as required pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program and related procurement requirements of the state and (ii) neutral, on average, to the ratepayers of the electrical corporation.

(E) The commission has determined that the reorganization plan and other documents resolving the insolvency proceeding recognize the contributions of ratepayers, if any, and compensate them accordingly through mechanisms approved by the commission, which may include sharing of value appreciation.

(2) For a regional electrical corporation, it shall have requested to participate and have established a charge required by the commission pursuant to Section 3289. The charge shall be included on monthly bills for customers. Collections on that charge shall be remitted, on a monthly basis, to the administrator for deposit into the fund.

(c) A participating electrical corporation may seek payment from the fund to satisfy settled or finally adjudicated eligible claims. Only eligible claims shall be made against or paid by the fund. In accordance with the procedures established by the administrator, the administrator shall review and approve any settlement of an eligible claim as being in the reasonable business judgment of the electrical corporation before releasing funds to the electrical corporation for payment. To the extent approved by the administrator, the settlement shall not be
 subject to further review by the commission.

(d) Within six months after the commission adopts a decision in an application filed pursuant to Section 1701.8, the electrical corporation shall reimburse the fund for the full amount of payments received from the fund. The electrical corporation may recover in rates those costs and expenses allowed by the commission pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, as applicable.

(e) The administrator may authorize an electrical corporation that is formed after July 12, 2019, to participate in the fund if the administrator determines that the electrical corporation meets the requirements of this section, other than the requirement that the conditions be met by June 30, 2020. The authorization shall be effective as of a date determined by the administrator and shall apply to covered wildfires after the date of authorization.

(f) The fund shall terminate when the administrator determines that the fund is no longer necessary to serve the purposes of this part. Upon the determination of the administrator that the fund shall be terminated, the administrator shall pay all remaining eligible claims and fund expenses, liquidate any remaining assets, and refund the remaining funds to ratepayers.

(g) This section shall become inoperative upon timely payment of the initial contribution pursuant to Section 3292 by each large electrical corporation not subject to an insolvency proceeding on July 12, 2019, and is repealed on January 1 of the following year. The administrator shall notify the Secretary of State as to whether those payments were timely made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 44.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section conditionally inoperative.    Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3292.

(a) If, no later than July 27, 2019, each large electrical corporation not subject to an insolvency proceeding on July 12, 2019, notifies the commission of its commitment to provide the initial contribution and the annual contributions, and subsequently provides its initial contribution as set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the fund shall be established to pay eligible claims as set forth in subdivision (f) and obtain reimbursement from electrical corporations as set forth in subdivision (h).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), to participate in the fund established pursuant to subdivision (a), an electrical corporation shall satisfy the following conditions by no later than June 30, 2020:

(1) The electrical corporation is not, and has not been since July 12, 2019, the subject of an insolvency proceeding or on criminal probation unless the electrical corporation meets the following conditions:

(A) The electrical corporation’s insolvency proceeding has been resolved pursuant to a plan or similar document not subject to a stay.

(B) The bankruptcy court or a court of competent jurisdiction, in the insolvency proceeding, has determined that the resolution of the insolvency proceeding provides funding or establishes reserves for, provides for assumption of, or otherwise provides for satisfying any prepetition wildfire claims asserted against the electrical corporation in the insolvency proceeding in the amounts agreed upon in any pre-insolvency proceeding settlement agreements or any post-insolvency settlement agreements, authorized by the court through an
 estimation process or otherwise allowed by the court.

(C) The commission has approved the reorganization plan and other documents resolving the insolvency proceeding, including the electrical corporation’s resulting governance structure as being acceptable in light of the electrical corporation’s safety history, criminal probation, recent financial condition, and other factors deemed relevant by the commission.

(D) The commission has determined that the reorganization plan and other documents resolving the insolvency proceeding are (i) consistent with the state’s climate goals as required pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program and related procurement requirements of the state and (ii) neutral, on average, to the ratepayers of the electrical corporation.

(E) The commission has determined that
 the reorganization plan and other documents resolving the insolvency proceeding recognize the contributions of ratepayers, if any, and compensate them accordingly through mechanisms approved by the commission, which may include sharing of value appreciation.

(2) For a regional electrical corporation, it has voluntarily established a charge required by the commission pursuant to Section 3289. This charge shall be included on monthly bills for customers. Collections on that charge shall be remitted, on a monthly basis, to the administrator for deposit into the fund.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (e), the electrical corporation has provided its initial contribution to the fund no later than September 10, 2019. Initial contributions shall not be recovered from the ratepayers of an electrical corporation, except Golden State Energy.

(c) Each participating electrical corporation shall make its annual contribution by January 1 of each calendar year, including, without limitation, any annual contributions for calendar years in which the electrical corporation, or another electrical corporation to which the electrical corporation is the successor, was not a participating electrical corporation. Annual contributions shall not be recovered from the ratepayers of an electrical corporation, except Golden State Energy.

(d) (1) The administrator may, and in the case of Golden State Energy shall, authorize an electrical corporation that is formed after July 12, 2019, to participate in the fund if the administrator determines that the electrical corporation meets the requirements of this section. Authorization of an electrical corporation that is formed after July 12, 2019, shall be effective as of a date
 determined by the administrator and shall apply to covered wildfires after the date of authorization.
